Mississippi, session 2026, SB2823.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1) The Legislature finds that Section 618 of the federal IDEA requires that each state submit data about the infants and toddlers, ages birth through age two (2), who receive early intervention (EI) services under Part C to the U.S. Department of Education (DOE) Office of Special Education Programs, in order to improve and provide services for infants and toddlers by providing leadership and financial support to assist this program.  This data requirement includes the number of children served and the percentage of children in the state's birth through two (2) years served in an EI program.  The Federal Department of Education has determined that the State of Mississippi is not in compliance with Part C requirements and has received a determination status of "needs intervention." (2)  The State Board of Education is hereby designated as the lead agency to implement the state's Early Intervention (EI) Program under Section 618 of the federal IDEA Part C requiring data about infants and toddlers, ages birth through two (2), who receive early intervention (EI) services.  The State Board of Education is authorized and directed to meet state compliance standards with Part C requirements and to improve access to Early Intervention services under Part C. (3)  The State Board of Education is further authorized and directed to develop legislative recommendations regarding the operation and management of the First Steps Early Intervention Program as reported by the 2024 Mississippi IDEA Part C Early Intervention Task Force created by Senate Bill No. 2727, 2024 Regular Session, and submit a report to the 2027 Regular Session. (4)  The goal of these recommendations shall be to collaborate with the state agency coordinating Part C of IDEA to design a new service delivery model and make changes to the Early Intervention Program. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.